converters/o2t.xfst
        .o. %+Cond  -> %<cond%>
        .o. %+Desr  -> %<cond%>
        .o. %+Opt   -> %<opt%>
        .o. %+Imp   -> %<imp%>
        .o. %+Prog2 -> %<impf%>
        .o. %+Neces -> %<obl%>
        .o. %+Past  -> %<past%>
        .o. %+Fut   -> %<fut%>
        .o. %+Narr  -> %<evid%>
        .o. %+Aor   -> %<aor%>
        .o. %+Prog1 -> %<cont%>


        .o. %+Cop %+A3sg -> %<3s%> %<dir%>
        .o. %+Cop %+A3pl -> %<dir%> %<3p%>

        .o. %+Cop -> %<dir%>


! question particle
              
        .o. %+Ques -> %<Q%>

! verbal agreement
        .o. %+A1sg  -> %<1s%>
        .o. %+A2sg  -> %<2s%>
        .o. %+A3sg  -> %<3s%>
        .o. %+A1pl  -> %<1p%>
        .o. %+A2pl  -> %<2p%>
        .o. %+A3pl  -> %<3p%>

!postpositons
        .o. %+Postp %+PCAbl -> %<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>
        .o. %+Postp %+PCAcc -> %<Postp%:adv%:accC%>
        .o. %+Postp %+PCDat -> %<Postp%:adv%:datC%>
        .o. %+Postp %+PCIns -> %<Postp%:adv%:insC%>
        .o. %+Postp %+PCNom -> %<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>
        .o. %+Postp %+PCGen -> %<Postp%:adv%:genC%>

!
! conjunctions
! hem, ve, veya  make both, we pick arbitrarily
!

        .o. %+Conj -> %<Cnj%:adv%>
           || [ {ama}|{ancak}|{çünkü}|{da}|{de}|{fakat}|
                {halbuki}|{hatta}|{lakin}|{meğer}|
                {meğerse}|{örneğin}|{oysa}| {yahut}|{yani}|{zira}] _
        .o. %+Conj -> %<Cnj%:sub%>
            || [{eğer}|{şayet}|{ki}] _
        .o. %+Conj -> %<Cnj%:coo%>
!           || [{ya}|{ne}|{veya}|{ve}|{kah}|{gerek}|
!               {ister}|{değil}|{gerekse}|{ha}}|{hem}}|
!               {ila}}|{ile}] _

        .o. %+Det  -> %<Det%:def%>
            || [{o}|{bu}|{şu}|{her}|{her% bir}|{herbir}|
                {bütün}|{tüm}|{aynı}|{öte}|{öteki}|{beri}|
                {beriki}|{öbür}|{diğer}|{tek}|{hangi}] _
        .o. %+Det -> %<Det%:indef%>

        .o. %+Interj -> %<Ij%>



        .o. %+Dup -> %<Adv%:partial%>

        .o. %<N%> %+Prop -> %<N%:prop%>

!
        .o. %^DB -> 0

!
!
!        .o. A -> a, B -> b, C -> c, Ç -> ç, D -> d, E -> e,
!            F -> f, G -> g, Ğ -> ğ, H -> h, I -> ı, İ -> i,
!            J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, O -> o,
!            Ö -> ö, P -> p, R -> r, S -> s, Ş -> ş, T -> t,
!            U -> u, Ü -> ü, V -> v, Y -> y, Z -> z, Î -> î,
!            Û -> û, Â -> â, X -> x, Q -> q, W -> w
!            // .#. ucase lcase* _ ?* "<N:prop>"

!
! special cases
        .o. %<cond%> -> %<cpl%:cond%>,
            %<past%> -> %<cpl%:past%>,
            %<evid%> -> %<cpl%:evid%> || .#. i %<V%> _

        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Exist%> || .#. {var} _ 
        .o. %<Adj%> -> %<Exist%:neg%> || .#. {yok} _ 
        .o. %<V%>   -> %<Not%> %<%0%> %<V%> || .#. {değil} _

        .o. {birinci} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {bir} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {ikinci} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {iki} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {üçüncü} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {üç} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {dördüncü} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {dört} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {beşinci} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {beş} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {altıncı} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {altı} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {yedinci} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {yedi} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {sekizinci} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {sekiz} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {dokuzuncu} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {dokuz} %<Num%> %<ord%>
        .o. {onuncu} %<Num%> %<ord%> -> {on} %<Num%> %<ord%>

        .o.  l [e|a] r %<Num%> -> %<Num%> %<pl%> %<ca%> %<Adj%> || {on}|{yüz}|{bin}|{milyon} _
        
        .o. %<p3s%> -> 0    || .#. {kendi} %<Prn%:refl%:3s%> _




        .o. {ne} %<Adj%> -> {ne} %<Prn%:qst%> 
        .o. {nasıl} %<Adj%> -> {nasıl} %<Adj%:qst%> 
!
        .o. {türk} %<Adj%>          -> {Türk} %<N%:prop%>       || .#. _
        .o. {türk} %<N%>            -> {Türk} %<N%:prop%>       || .#. _
        .o. {türkçe} %<Adj%>        -> {Türkçe} %<N%:prop%>     || .#. _
        .o. {fransızca} %<N%>       -> {Fransızca} %<N%:prop%>  || .#. _
        .o. {ingilizce} %<Adj%>     -> {İngilizce} %<N%:prop%>  || .#. _
        .o. {rum} %<N%>             -> {Rum} %<N%:prop%>        || .#. _
        .o. {rus} %<N%>             -> {Rus} %<N%:prop%>        || .#. _
        .o. {sırp} %<N%>            -> {Sırp} %<N%:prop%>       || .#. _
        .o. {italyan} %<Adj%>       -> {İtalyan} %<N%:prop%>    || .#. _
        .o. {japon} %<Adj%>         -> {Japon} %<N%:prop%>    || .#. _
        .o. {gürcü} %<Adj%>         -> {Gürcü} %<N%:prop%>      || .#. _
        .o. {bulgar} %<N%>          -> {Bulgar} %<N%:prop%>     || .#. _
        .o. {ermeni} %<N%>          -> {Ermeni} %<N%:prop%>     || .#. _
        .o. {kürt} %<N%>            -> {Kürt} %<N%:prop%>       || .#. _
        .o. {yunan} %<N%>           -> {Yunan} %<N%:prop%>      || .#. _
        .o. {alman} %<N%>           -> {Alman} %<N%:prop%>      || .#. _
        .o. {fransız} %<N%>         -> {Fransız} %<N%:prop%>    || .#. _
        .o. {japon} %<N%>           -> {Japon} %<N%:prop%>      || .#. _
        .o. {italyan} %<N%>         -> {İtalyan} %<N%:prop%>    || .#. _
        .o. %<N%> -> %<N%:prop%> || .#. {islam} _
        .o. {islam} %<N%:prop%>     -> {İslam} %<N%:prop%>      || .#. _
        .o. {hıristiyan} %<N%>      -> {Hıristiyan} %<N%:prop%> || .#. _
        .o. {yahudi} %<N%>          -> {Yahudi} %<N%:prop%>     || .#. _
        .o. {kur'an} %<N%>          -> {Kur'an} %<N%:prop%>     || .#. _
        .o. {aczmendi<N>} %<N%>     -> {Aczimendi} %<N%:prop%>  || .#. _
        .o. {AtaTürk} %<N%:prop%>   -> {Atatürk} %<N%:prop%>    || .#.  _

!
        .o. {Abd} %<N%:prop%>       -> {ABD} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Imf} %<N%:prop%>       -> {IMF} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Öys} %<N%:prop%>       -> {ÖYS} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Dyp} %<N%:prop%>       -> {DYP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Rp} %<N%:prop%>        -> {RP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Anap} %<N%:prop%>      -> {ANAP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Chp} %<N%:prop%>       -> {CHP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Tbmm} %<N%:prop%>      -> {TBMM} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Ab} %<N%:prop%>        -> {AB} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Pkk} %<N%:prop%>       -> {PKK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Dtp} %<N%:prop%>       -> {DTP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Dsp} %<N%:prop%>       -> {DSP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Tüsiad} %<N%:prop%>    -> {TÜSİAD} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>   || .#. _
        .o. {Yök} %<N%:prop%>       -> {YÖK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Kktc} %<N%:prop%>      -> {KKTC} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Ssk} %<N%:prop%>       -> {SSK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Dgm} %<N%:prop%>       -> {DGM} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Nato} %<N%:prop%>      -> {NATO} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Öss} %<N%:prop%>       -> {ÖSS} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Bbp} %<N%:prop%>       -> {BBP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Spk} %<N%:prop%>       -> {SPK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Aa} %<N%:prop%>        -> {AA} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Tsk} %<N%:prop%>       -> {TSK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Mit} %<N%:prop%>       -> {MİT} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Dhkp} %<N%:prop%>      -> {DHKP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Tl} %<N%:prop%>        -> {TL} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Bm} %<N%:prop%>        -> {BM} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Dp} %<N%:prop%>        -> {DP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {tgc} %<N%>             -> {TGC} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {dp} %<N%>              -> {DP} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Tc} %<N%:prop%>        -> {TC} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>       || .#. _
        .o. {Mgk} %<N%:prop%>       -> {MGK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {Oecd} %<N%:prop%>      -> {OECD} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {İmkb} %<N%:prop%>      -> {İMKB} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Tobb} %<N%:prop%>      -> {TOBB} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {jitem} %<N%>           -> {JİTEM} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>    || .#. _
        .o. {Jitem} %<N%:prop%>     -> {JİTEM} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>    || .#. _
        .o. {ımf} %<N%:prop%>       -> {IMF} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {ımf} %<N%>             -> {IMF} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {tedaş} %<N%>           -> {TEDAŞ} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>    || .#. _
        .o. {Odtü} %<N%>            -> {ODTÜ} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {Kesk} %<N%>            -> {KESK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>     || .#. _
        .o. {kobi} %<N%>            -> {KOBİ} %<N%:abbr%>           || .#. _
        .o. {Kobi} %<N%>            -> {KOBİ} %<N%:abbr%>           || .#. _
        .o. {Tck} %<N%>             -> {TCK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {tdk} %<N%>             -> {TDK} %<N%:prop%:abbr%>      || .#. _
        .o. {tv} %<N%>              -> {TV} %<N%:abbr%>             || .#. _
        .o. {km} %<N%>              -> {km} %<N%:abbr%>             || .#. _
        .o. {vs} %<N%>              -> {vs} %<N%:abbr%>             || .#. _
        .o. {vb} %<N%>              -> {vb} %<N%:abbr%>             || .#. _




!        {üzer} %<N%> %<p3s%> -> {üzer} %<N%> %<p3s%> %<Prn%>
        .o. l [i|ı|ü|u] %<N%>        ->  %<N%> %<li%> %<Adj%> || .#.  liAdj  _ .#.
        .o. l [i|ı|ü|u] %<N%>        ->  %<N%> %<li%> %<Adj%> %<%0%> %<N%> || .#. liAdj _ 
        .o. {yardımcı} %<N%> %<p3s%> -> {yardım} %<N%> %<ci%> %<N%> %<p3s%>
        .o. {geçen} %<Adj%>          -> {geç} %<V%> %<part%:pres%> %<Adj%>
        .o. {önce} %<N%> %<ki%> %<Adj%>  -> {önce} %<Adv%> %<ki%> %<Adj%>


        .o. {dergah} %<N%>           -> {dergâh} %<N%>      || .#. _
        .o. {kağıt} %<N%>            -> {kâğıt} %<N%>       || .#. _
        .o. {hikaye} %<N%>           -> {hikâye} %<N%>      || .#. _
        .o. {hala} %<Adv%>           -> {hâlâ} %<Adv%>      || .#. _
        .o. {hayati} %<Adj%>         -> {hayatî} %<Adj%>    || .#. _
        .o. {nihai} %<Adj%>          -> {nihaî} %<Adj%>     || .#. _
        .o. {şura} %<N%>             -> {şûra} %<Adv%>      || .#. _
        .o. {mekan} %<Adv%>          -> {mekân} %<Adv%>     || .#. _
        .o. {vekalet} %<Adv%>        -> {vekâlet} %<Adv%>   || .#. _
        .o. {dahi} %<N%>             -> {dâhi} %<Adj%>      || .#. _
        .o. {mahkum} %<Adj%>         -> {mahkûm} %<Adj%>    || .#. _
        .o. {hakim} %<N%>            -> {hâkim} %<Adj%>     || .#. _
        .o. {nikah} %<N%>            -> {nikâh} %<N%>       || .#. _
        .o. {islami} %<Adj%>         -> {islamî} %<Adj%>    || .#. _
        .o. {şikayet} %<Adj%>        -> {şikâyet} %<N%>     || .#. _
        .o. {mahkumiyet} %<N%>       -> {mahkûmiyet} %<N%>  || .#. _
        .o. {imkan} %<Adj%>          -> {imkân} %<N%>       || .#. _
        .o. {imkan} %<N%>            -> {imkân} %<N%>       || .#. _
        .o. {harekat} %<N%>          -> {harekât} %<N%>     || .#. _


        .o. [..] -> i || .#. {milletvekil}|{içiş}|{dışiş}  _ %<N%> (%<pl%>) [%<p3s%>|%<p3p%>]
        .o. k -> ğ i || .#. {işbirli}  _ %<N%> %<p3s%>
        .o. leri -> i || .#. {içiş}|{dışiş}  _ %<N%> %<pl%> %<p3s%>
        .o. [..] -> ı || .#. {cumhurbaşkan}|{yılbaş}|{işadam} _ %<N%> %<p3s%>
        .o. [..] -> u || .#. {kamuoy}                _ %<N%> %<p3s%>

        .o. %<Prn%:qst%> -> %<Prn%:qst%:locp%> || .#. {nere} _
        .o. l [i|ı|u|ü] k %<N%> -> %<N%> %<lik%> %<N%> || .#.  likNN _
        .o. l [i|ı|u|ü] k %<N%> -> %<Adj%> %<lik%> %<N%> || .#.  likJN _


        .o. {biri} -> {bir} || .#. _ %<Det%:indef%>
        .o. {hepsi} %<Det%:indef%> %<p3p%> %<Prn%> -> {hep} %<Adv%> %<p3s%> %<Prn%>
        .o. {iken} %<Adv%> -> i %<V%> %<cv%:ken%> %<Adv%>  || .#. _


        .o. %<N%> -> %<N%> %<ci%> %<N%>    || .#. {yardımcı} _
